North Carolina statutes. Chapter 108A. Social Services.
Part 1. County Boards of Social Services.

§ 108A-1.
Creation.

Every county shall have a governing board for social services, which may be a county board of social services created pursuant to this Part, a consolidated human services board created pursuant to

G.S. 153A-77(b)

, a board of county commissioners that has assumed the powers and duties of a county board of social services or a consolidated human services board, or a regional board of social services created pursuant to

G.S. 108A-15.8

. The governing board shall establish policies for the programs established by this Chapter in conformity with the rules and regulations of the Social Services Commission and under the supervision of the Department of Health and Human Services. Provided, however, policies for the program of medical assistance shall be established in conformity with the rules and regulations of the Department of Health and Human Services.

History.

1917, c. 170, s. 1; 1919, c. 46, s. 3; C.S., s. 5014; 1937, c. 319, s. 3; 1941, c. 270, s. 2; 1945, c. 47; 1953, c. 132; 1955, c. 249; 1957, c. 100, s. 1; 1959, c. 1255, s. 1; 1961, c. 186; 1963, c. 139; c. 247, ss. 1, 2; 1969, c. 546, s. 1; 1973, c. 476, s. 138; 1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1219, s. 6; 1981, c. 275, s. 1; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 690, s. 5; 1997-443, s. 11A.118(a); 2017-41, s. 4.2.

Cross References.

As to certain financial assistance and in-kind goods not being considered in determining assistance paid under Chapter 108A and Chapter 111, see

G.S. 108A-26

.

As to the Social Services Commission, see

G.S. 143B-153

et seq.

§ 108A-2.
Size.

The county board of social services of a county shall consist of three members, except that the board of commissioners of any county may increase such number to five members. The decision to increase the size to five members or to reduce a five-member board to three shall be reported immediately in writing by the chairman of the board of commissioners to the Department of Health and Human Services.

History.

1917, c. 170, s. 1; 1919, c. 46, s. 3; C.S., s. 5014; 1937, c. 319, s. 3; 1941, c. 270, s. 2; 1945, c. 47; 1953, c. 132; 1955, c. 249; 1957, c. 100, s. 1; 1959, c. 1255, s. 1; 1961, c. 186; 1963, c. 139; c. 247, ss. 1, 2; 1969, c. 546, s. 1; 1973, c. 476, s. 138; 1981, c. 275, s. 1; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 690, s. 6; 1997-443, s. 11A.118(a).

Local Modification.

Mecklenburg: 1981, c. 625.

§ 108A-3.
Method of appointment; residential qualifications; fee or compensation for services; consolidated human services board appointments.

Three-Member Board. — The board of commissioners shall appoint one member who may be a county commissioner or a citizen selected by the board; the Social Services Commission shall appoint one member; and the two members so appointed shall select the third member. In the event the two members so appointed are unable to agree upon selection of the third member, the senior regular resident superior court judge of the county shall make the selection.

Five-Member Board. — The procedure set forth in subsection (a) shall be followed, except that both the board of commissioners and the Social Services Commission shall appoint two members each, and the four so appointed shall select the fifth member by majority vote of the membership. If a majority of the four are unable to agree upon the fifth member, the senior regular superior court judge of the county shall make the selection.

Provided further that each member so appointed under subsection (a) and subsection (b) of this section by the Social Services Commission and by the county board of commissioners or the senior regular resident superior court judge of the county, shall be bona fide residents of the county from which they are appointed to serve, and will receive as their fee or compensation for their services rendered from the Department of Health and Human Services directly or indirectly only the fees and compensation as provided by

G.S. 108A-8

.

Consolidated Human Services Board. — The board of county commissioners shall be the sole appointing authority for members of a consolidated human services board and shall appoint those members in accordance with

G.S. 153A-77(c)

.

History.

1917, c. 170, s. 1; 1919, c. 46, s. 3; C.S., s. 5014; 1937, c. 319, s. 3; 1941, c. 270, s. 2; 1945, c. 47; 1953, c. 132; 1955, c. 249; 1957, c. 100, s. 1; 1959, c. 1255, s. 1; 1961, c. 186; 1963, c. 139; c. 247, ss. 1, 2; 1969, c. 546, s. 1; 1971, c. 369; 1973, c. 476, s. 138; 1981, c. 275, s. 1; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 690, s. 7; 1997-135, s. 1; 1997-443, s. 11A.118(a).

OPINIONS OF ATTORNEY GENERAL

Subsection (b) does not require

that all four members of a five member county board of social services be present when the board selects its fifth member. See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. Stephen M. Schoeberle, Burke County Staff Attorney, 58 N.C. Op. Att'y Gen. 48 (1988).

Subsection (b) requires

that the other four members of a county board of social services be unanimous in their selection of the fifth member. See opinion of the Attorney General to Mr. Stephen M. Schoeberle, Burke County Staff Attorney, 58 N.C. Op. Att'y Gen. 48 (1988).

The legislature intended to permit a county commissioner to serve as a member of the county social services board.

See opinion of Attorney General to C. Preston Cornelius, Senior Resident, Superior Court Judge, 60 N.C. Op. Att'y Gen. 50 (1990).

§ 108A-4.
Term of appointment.

Each member of a county board of social services shall serve for a term of three years. No member may serve more than two consecutive terms. Notwithstanding the previous sentence, the limitation on consecutive terms does not apply if the member of the social services board was a member of the board of county commissioners at any time during the first two consecutive terms, and is a member of the board of county commissioners at the time of reappointment.

History.

1917, c. 170, s. 1; 1919, c. 46, s. 3; C.S., s. 5014; 1937, c. 319, s. 3; 1941, c. 270, s. 2; 1945, c. 47; 1953, c. 132; 1955, c. 249; 1957, c. 100, s. 1; 1959, c. 1255, s. 1; 1961, c. 186; 1963, c. 139; c. 247, ss. 1, 2; 1969, c. 546, s. 1; 1981, c. 275, s. 1; c. 770.

§ 108A-5.
Order of appointment.

Three-Member Board: The term of the member appointed by the Social Services Commission shall expire on June 30, 1981, and every three years thereafter; the term of the member appointed by the board of commissioners shall expire on June 30, 1983, and every three years thereafter; and the term of the third member shall expire on June 30, 1982, and every three years thereafter.

Five-Member Board: Whenever a board of commissioners of any county decides to expand a three-member board to a five-member board of social services, the Social Services Commission shall appoint an additional member for a term expiring at the same time as the term of the existing member appointed by the board of commissioners, and the board of commissioners shall appoint an additional member for a term expiring at the same time as the term of the existing member appointed by the Social Services Commission. The change to a five-member board shall become effective at the time when the additional members shall have been appointed by both the county board of commissioners and the Social Services Commission. Thereafter all appointments shall be for three-year terms.

Change from Five-Member to Three-Member Board: The change shall become effective on the first day of July following the decision to change by the board of commissioners. On that day, the following two seats on the board of social services shall cease to exist:

The seat held by the member appointed by the Social Services Commission whose term would have expired on June 30, 1983, or triennially thereafter; and

The seat held by the member appointed by the board of commissioners whose term would have expired June 30, 1981, or triennially thereafter.

History.

1917, c. 170, s. 1; 1919, c. 46, s. 3; C.S., s. 5014; 1937, c. 319, s. 3; 1941, c. 270, s. 2; 1945, c. 47; 1953, c. 132; 1955, c. 249; 1957, c. 100, s. 1; 1959, c. 1255, s. 1; 1961, c. 1986; 1963, c. 139; c. 247, ss. 1, 2; 1969, c. 546, s. 1; 1973, c. 476, s. 138; c. 724, s. 1; 1981, c. 275, s. 1.

§ 108A-6.
Vacancies.

Appointments to fill vacancies shall be made in the manner set out in

G.S. 108A-3

. All such appointments shall be for the remainder of the former member’s term of office and shall not constitute a term for the purposes of

G.S. 108A-4

.

History.

1917, c. 170, s. 1; 1919, c. 46, s. 3; C.S., s. 5014; 1937, c. 319, s. 3; 1941, c. 270, s. 2; 1945, c. 47; 1953, c. 132; 1955, c. 249; 1957, c. 100, s. 1; 1959, c. 1255, s. 1; 1961, c. 186; 1963, c. 139; c. 247, ss. 1, 2; 1969, c. 546, s. 1; 1981, c. 275, s. 1.

§ 108A-7.
Meetings.

The board of social services of a county shall meet at least once per month, or more often if a meeting is called by the chairman. Such board shall elect a chairman from its members at its July meeting each year, and the chairman shall serve a term of one year or until a new chairman is elected by the board. A consolidated county human services board shall meet in accordance with the provisions of

G.S. 153A-77

.

History.

1917, c. 170, s. 1; 1919, c. 46, s. 4; C.S., s. 5015; 1937, c. 319, s. 4; 1941, c. 270, s. 3; 1947, c. 92; 1959, c. 320; 1961, c. 186; 1969, c. 546, s. 1; 1981, c. 275, s. 1; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 690, s. 8.

§ 108A-8.
Compensation of members.

Members of the county board of social services may receive a per diem in such amount as shall be established by the county board of commissioners. Reimbursement for subsistence and travel shall be in accordance with a policy set by the county board of commissioners.

History.

1917, c. 170, s. 1; 1919, c. 46, s. 4; C.S., s. 5015; 1937, c. 319, s. 4; 1941, c. 270, s. 3; 1947, c. 92; 1959, c. 320; 1961, c. 186; 1969, c. 546, s. 1; 1971, c. 124; 1981, c. 275, s. 1; 1985, c. 418, s. 3.

§ 108A-9.
Duties and responsibilities.

The county board of social services shall have the following duties and responsibilities:

To select the county director of social services according to the merit system rules of the North Carolina Human Resources Commission;

To advise county and municipal authorities in developing policies and plans to improve the social conditions of the community;

To consult with the director of social services about problems relating to his office, and to assist him in planning budgets for the county department of social services;

To transmit or present the budgets of the county department of social services for public assistance, social services, and administration to the board of county commissioners;

To have such other duties and responsibilities as the General Assembly, the Department of Health and Human Services or the Social Services Commission or the board of county commissioners may assign to it.

History.

1917, c. 170, s. 1; 1919, c. 46, s. 3; C.S., s. 5014; 1937, c. 319, s. 3; 1941, c. 270, s. 2; 1945, c. 47; 1953, c. 132; 1955, c. 249; 1957, c. 100, s. 1; 1959, c. 1255, s. 1; 1961, c. 186; 1963, c. 139; c. 247, ss. 1, 2; 1969, c. 546, s. 1; 1973, c. 476, s. 138; 1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1219, s. 7; 1981, c. 275, s. 1; 1997-443, s. 11A.118(a); 2013-382, s. 9.1(c).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-382, s. 9.1(c), effective August 21, 2013, substituted “North Carolina Human Resources Commission” for “State Personnel Commission” in subdivision (1).

§ 108A-10.
Fees.

The county board of social services is authorized to enter into contracts with any governmental or private agency, or with any person, whereby the board of social services agrees to render services to or for such agency or person in exchange for a fee to cover the cost of rendering such service. This authority is to be limited to services voluntarily rendered and voluntarily received, but shall not apply where the charging of a fee for a particular service is specifically prohibited by statute or regulation. The fees to be charged under the authority of this section are to be based upon a plan recommended by the county director of social services and approved by the local board of social services and the board of county commissioners. In no event is the fee charged to exceed the cost to the board of social services. Fee policies may not conflict with rules and regulations adopted by the Social Services Commission or Department of Health and Human Services regarding fees.

The fees collected under the authority of this section are to be deposited to the account of the social services department so that they may be expended for social services purposes in accordance with the provisions of Article 3 of Chapter 159, the Local Government Budget and Fiscal Control Act. No individual employee is to receive any compensation over and above his regular salary as a result of rendering services for which a fee is charged.

The county board of social services shall annually report to the county commissioners receipts received under this section. Fees collected under this section shall not be used to replace any other funds, either State or local, for the program for which the fees were collected.

History.

1981, c. 275, s. 1; 1997-443, s. 11A.118(a).

§ 108A-11.
Inspection of records by members.

Every member of the county board of social services may inspect and examine any record on file in the office of the director relating in any manner to applications for and provision of public assistance and social services authorized by this Chapter. No member shall disclose or make public any information which he may acquire by examining such records.

History.

1917, c. 170, s. 1; 1919, c. 46, s. 3; C.S., s. 5014; 1937, c. 319, s. 3; 1941, c. 270, s. 2; 1945, c. 47; 1953, c. 132; 1955, c. 249; 1957, c. 100, s. 1; 1959, c. 1255, s. 1; 1961, c. 186; 1963, c. 139; c. 247, ss. 1, 2; 1969, c. 546, s. 1; 1981, c. 275, s. 1.